Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 23.1 The Coastal and Estuary Habitat Restoration Program and Trust Fund

46-23.1-1.
Findings and purpose.

Coastal and estuarine habitat such as coastal wetlands, anadromous fish runs, and eelgrass beds are threatened, damaged, or have been destroyed by historic pollution, oil spills, incompatible development, and other factors. The coastal and estuarine habitats of Rhode Island’s waters provide great benefits to the citizens of this state including, but not limited to, protection from coastal storms and erosion. Coastal and estuarine habitat resources also serve as nurseries and breeding grounds for important recreational and commercial finfish and shellfish populations, capture and filter run-off pollution, and significantly contribute to the state’s economic, community and ecological health. Restoration of tidally restricted coastal wetlands can also ensure protection of human health and safety by controlling populations of certain salt marsh mosquitoes known to carry the Eastern Equine Encephalitis virus. The state’s economy is directly dependent on the health and productivity of Rhode Island’s coastal waters, including Narragansett Bay and the coastal ponds. Destruction of coastal and estuarine habitats has been identified as one of the leading causes of decline in economically important fish, shellfish, and other natural resources. Restoring degraded coastal and estuarine habitats is essential for reversing declines in fishery resources and protecting human health and safety. Since healthy and diverse coastal and estuarine habitats are better able to support fish and wildlife resources that have been impacted, and are likely to be impacted in the future, by pollution events such as oil spills, an investment by the state of Rhode Island to provide restoration planning and technical expertise and to implement measures to restore coastal and estuary habitats is vital to the economic prosperity and quality of life of the citizens of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 62, § 1.

46-23.1-2.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

“Council” means the coastal resources management council, its director or designee;

“Degraded habitat” means a habitat that has been negatively affected by human impacts, resulting in the loss or impairment of the following ecological functions including, but not limited to: finfish, shellfish, and wildlife nursery, spawning and foraging; water quality maintenance; pollutant removal; biological diversity; aquatic productivity; mosquito control; flood and storm damage; and erosion protection;

“Director” means the director of the department of environmental management, or his or her designee;

“Estuary” means a body of water where water from rivers, streams or groundwater meets salt water from the ocean;

“Habitat” means an area or place where plants or animals live. Rhode Island coastal and estuarine environments include a diversity of habitat types that provide food, nesting and resting areas, and shelter for fish and wildlife. For purposes of this chapter, types of habitat include: coastal wetlands, such as salt and brackish marshes; sea grass meadows, including eelgrass (Zostera marina); and widgeon grass (Ruppia maritima); and anadromous fish runs;

“Restoration” means the act, process, or result of returning a habitat to an approximation of its condition prior to disturbance. Restoration activities may include, but are not limited to, the reestablishment of physical parameters, including reestablishing or maintaining hydrology, whether by reestablishing river or tidal flow, restoring flood regimes, or reestablishing topography; control of exotic, non-native or invasive species of plants or animals; revegetation through native plantings or natural succession; removal of barriers or construction of fish ladders to provide passage for spawning or migrating fish; or controlling, reducing or eliminating other specific adverse impacts;

“The program” means the Rhode Island interagency coastal and estuarine habitat restoration program as described in §

46-23.1-5

;

“The strategy” means the statewide coastal and estuarine habitat restoration strategy as described in §

46-23.1-5

;

“The trust” means the Rhode Island coastal and estuarine habitat restoration trust fund, as described in §

46-23.1-3

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 62, § 1.

46-23.1-3.
The Rhode Island coastal and estuarine habitat restoration trust fund.

Establishment. There is established within the coastal resources management council a Rhode Island coastal and estuarine habitat restoration trust fund (the “trust”). On July 1, 2002, July 1, 2004 and each July 1st thereafter, two hundred and fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) of the fees collected under the uniform oil spill response and prevention statute (§

46-12.7-4.1

) shall be deposited into the trust. The trust shall be available for disbursement by the council in accordance with the restrictions and purposes of this chapter and subject to an annual appropriation by the legislature. The trust may also receive federal, state, municipal, and private grants, gifts, or donations. Funds in the trust shall not be used for mitigating any current, planned or future projects that degrade, fill, or otherwise destroy coastal or estuarine habitats. Funds in the trust shall not be used to fulfill any liability for restoration required by any local, state or federal agency pursuant to an environmental or public health enforcement action.

Funding of estuary and coastal habitat restoration activities. Factors to be taken into account by the technical committee for the purposes of granting monies for estuary and coastal habitat restoration activities, determining the eligibility of an estuary and coastal habitat restoration projects for financial assistance, and in prioritizing the selection of estuary and coastal habitat restoration projects by the technical committee shall include, but need not be limited to:

Consistency with the state estuary and coastal habitat restoration strategy, the Narragansett Bay comprehensive conservation and management plan, the state coastal nonpoint pollution control plan, the coastal resources management program, the department of environmental management regulations, and pertinent elements of the state guide plan;

The ability of the applicant to provide adequate personnel funding, and authority to carry out and properly maintain the estuary and coastal habitat restoration activity;

The proposed monitoring plan to ensure that short-term and long-term restoration goals are achieved;

The effectiveness of any nonpoint source pollution management efforts upstream and the likelihood of re-impairment;

Whether the estuary and coastal habitat restoration activity can be shown to replace habitat losses that benefit fish and wildlife resources;

Potential water quality improvements;

Potential improvements to fish and wildlife habitats for species which are identified as rare or endangered by the Rhode Island Natural History Survey or the federal Endangered Species Act [16 U.S.C. § 1531 et seq.];

The level and extent of collaboration by partners (e.g., municipality, nongovernment organization, watershed council, federal agency, etc.); and

Potential direct economic benefit to a community or the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 62, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 44, § 1.

46-23.1-4.
Allocation of the trust.

Funds from the trust shall be used to carry out the purposes of this chapter as follows:

The administrative, personnel and equipment expenses required to carry out the activities of the program as described in this chapter. The council shall be responsible for submitting annual budget requests for its administrative and implementation costs of the program;

The design, planning, construction, and monitoring of coastal and estuarine restoration projects as described in §

46-23.1-5

; and

Restoration projects that are not identified by the statewide coastal and estuary habitat restoration plan nor approved through the restoration grants process shall not be eligible for funding under this program.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 62, § 1.

46-23.1-5.
The Rhode Island coastal and estuarine habitat restoration program — Established.

The council shall develop and implement a coastal and estuarine habitat restoration program for the state of Rhode Island. The program shall consist of the following elements and perform the listed tasks:

Develop a statewide coastal and estuarine habitat restoration strategy. Within one year of enactment [June 13, 2002], the program, with the assistance from the technical advisory committee, shall adopt a statewide coastal and estuarine habitat restoration plan that provide for the conservation and restoration of the state’s coastal and estuarine habitats. The plan shall be developed with comprehensive public, agency, legislative and stakeholder participation, and shall include the following elements:

A description of the state’s coastal and estuarine habitats, including a consideration of their importance to the economy, ecology and quality of life in the state and in local communities;

Quantitative and qualitative restoration goals pertaining to coastal wetlands, eelgrass beds, and anadromous fish runs;

An inventory of coastal and estuarine restoration projects, along with criteria for prioritizing and selecting projects for implementation;

A projected comprehensive budget and timeline necessary to accomplish the goals of the plan;

Identification of municipal, state, federal, private, or other funding and resources to assist in the development or implementation of the plan;

An outreach element to educate municipal officials, civic and nonprofit organizations, educational institutions and the general public about the availability of restoration grants; and

Provisions for updating the plan and project inventory periodically.

Restoration grants.

The program shall establish and execute an annual process for the solicitation, evaluation and award of restoration grants for projects that seek to restore coastal and estuarine habitats. The technical advisory committee or a subcommittee of it shall serve as an advisory board to the council and the program staff throughout this process. Entities qualified to apply for and receive grants for design, planning, construction or monitoring under this section include all of the following: cities and towns; any committee, board, or commission chartered by a city or town; nonprofit corporations; civic groups, educational institutions; and state agencies.

The program shall submit to the governor and the general assembly during annual budget preparations a list of restoration project proposals that have received a positive review by the technical advisory committee and require funds from the trust to proceed with design, planning, construction or monitoring during the ensuing year.

Nothing contained in this section is intended to abrogate or effect the existing powers of the department of environmental management or the coastal resources management council.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 62, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 57.

46-23.1-5.1.
Eligibility.

In order to be eligible for direct grant assistance from the fund, applicants must demonstrate all of the following:

Demonstrate the ability to accomplish the project;

Compliance with any applicable element of the state estuary and coastal habitat restoration strategy; and

Successful completion of an estuary and coastal habitat restoration application as developed by the technical committee, and a favorable recommendation of grant assistance from the technical committee to the council.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 62, § 1.

46-23.1-6.
Interim project approval.

Prior to formal adoption of the statewide coastal and estuarine habitat restoration strategy individual projects that meet the definition of restoration contained in §

46-23.1-2

and have been previously identified by state or federal agencies may be approved by the program, in consultation with the technical advisory committee. Such projects may be submitted for funding as described in § 46-23.1-5(3)(i).

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 62, § 1.